Ohio, session 136, SB461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3335.39, 3339.06, 3344.07, 3345.382, 3345.58, 3352.16, and 3364.07 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3335.39. (A)(1) The Salmon P. Chase center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within the Ohio state university. The center shall have all the rights and privileges of an independent college of the university. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Salmon P. Chase center for civics, culture, and society shall be known as the Salmon P. Chase school for civics, culture, and society, and the director shall serve as dean of the school. On and after that date, whenever the term "center" is used, referred to, or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the use, reference, or designation shall be construed to mean the "school" unless another section of law expressly provides otherwise. (4) The board of trustees of the university may change the name of the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than fifteen tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have a role in center faculty promotion and tenure, except with the consent of the director. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. Nothing in this section precludes the ability for the center to apply for external funding opportunities and negotiate overhead charges as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. (3) The university shall provide adequate annual financial resources to the center to achieve its mission, as determined by the director. The sum of the annual money transferred from the university to the center plus the annual appropriation from the state to the center shall not be less than the highest annual appropriation provided by the state to the center in a main operating appropriation act. (4) Notwithstanding any university budget allocation methodology to the contrary, the center shall receive all tuition and other revenue from all of the courses it offers, subject only to charges applied to all other academic units. (5) The center shall have the authority to create independent endowments, both temporary and permanent, and a foundation for the sole benefit of the center and place funds from whatever source, including gifts, donations, grants, university funds and state appropriations, in such endowments. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member Chase center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage all aspects of the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for and to hire all faculty and staff, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director's authority includes determining the salary, tenure, and rank of faculty. The director may seek advice from faculty outside of the center but shall not be required to seek or receive such advice. The director shall have the sole, exclusive, and unlimited authority to oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval which of the center's courses that the director, in the director's sole and exclusive discretion, determines meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted have the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F)(F)(1) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. (2) The president or provost of the university shall report to the board of trustees at every board meeting on the progress of the center toward achieving its mission and the university's support for the center, including its academic program development, faculty and staff hiring, facility, and development and advancement. Sec. 3339.06. (A)(1) The Miami university center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within Miami university. The center shall have all the rights and privileges of an independent college of the university. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit physically located at the college of arts and sciences with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than ten tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have a role in center faculty promotion and tenure, except with the consent of the director. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. Nothing in this section precludes the ability for the center to apply for external funding opportunities and negotiate overhead charges as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. (3) The university shall provide adequate annual financial resources to the center to achieve its mission as determined by the director. The sum of the annual money transferred from the university to the center plus the annual appropriation from the state to the center shall not be less than the highest annual appropriation provided by the state to the center in a main operating appropriation act. (4) Notwithstanding any university budget allocation methodology to the contrary, the center shall receive all tuition and other revenue from all of the courses it offers, subject only to charges applied to all other academic units. (5) The center shall have the authority to create independent endowments, both temporary and permanent, and a foundation for the sole benefit of the center and place funds from whatever source, including gifts, donations, grants, university funds and state appropriations, in such endowments. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage all aspects of the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for and to hire all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director's authority includes determining the salary, tenure, and rank of faculty. The director may seek advice from faculty outside of the center but shall not be required to seek or receive such advice. The director shall have the sole, exclusive, and unlimited authority to oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval which of the center's courses that the director, in the director's sole and exclusive discretion, determines meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted have the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F)(F)(1) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. (2) The president or provost of the university shall report to the board of trustees at every board meeting on the progress of the center toward achieving its mission and the university's support for the center, including its academic program development, faculty and staff hiring, facility, and development and advancement. Sec. 3344.07. (A)(1) The Cleveland state university center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within Cleveland state university. The center shall have all the rights and privileges of an independent college of the university. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit physically located at the college of public affairs and education with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than ten tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have a role in center faculty promotion and tenure, except with the consent of the director. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. Nothing in this section precludes the ability for the center to apply for external funding opportunities and negotiate overhead charges as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. (3) The university shall provide adequate annual financial resources to the center to achieve its mission, as determined by the director. The sum of the annual money transferred from the university to the center plus the annual appropriation from the state to the center shall not be less than the highest annual appropriation provided by the state to the center in a main operating appropriation act. (4) Notwithstanding any university budget allocation methodology to the contrary, the center shall receive all tuition and other revenue from all of the courses it offers, subject only to charges applied to all other academic units. (5) The center shall have the authority to create independent endowments, both temporary and permanent, and a foundation for the sole benefit of the center and place funds from whatever source, including gifts, donations, grants, university funds and state appropriations, in such endowments. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage all aspects of the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for and to hire all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director's authority includes determining the salary, tenure, and rank of faculty. The director may seek advice from faculty outside of the center but shall not be required to seek or receive such advice. The director shall have the sole, exclusive, and unlimited authority to oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval which of the center's courses that the director, in the director's sole and exclusive discretion, determines meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted have the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F)(F)(1) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. (2) The president or provost of the university shall report to the board of trustees at every board meeting on the progress of the center toward achieving its mission and the university's support for the center, including its academic program development, faculty and staff hiring, facility, and development and advancement. Sec. 3345.382. (A) As used in this section, "state : (1) "Academic civics center" means one of the academic civic centers as defined in section 3345.58 of the Revised Code. (2) "College credit plus program" means the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (3) "Ohio civics board" means the Ohio civics board established under section 3345.58 of the Revised Code. (4) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) This division is subject to division (F) of this section. Each state institution of higher education shall develop a course with not fewer than three credit hours in the subject area of American civic literacy. The course shall include a study of the American economic system and capitalism. The course shall comply with the criteria, policies, and procedures established under section 3333.16 of the Revised Code. The course may be offered under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. The course shall, at a minimum, require each student to read all the following: (1) The entire Constitution of the United States; (2) The entire Declaration of Independence; (3) A minimum of five essays in their entirety from the Federalist Papers. The essays shall be selected by the department chair. (4) The entire Emancipation Proclamation; (5) The entire Gettysburg Address; (6) The entire Letter from Birmingham Jail written by Dr. Martin Luther King Jr; (7) The writings of Adam Smith, including a study of the principles written in The Wealth of Nations. Any student who takes the course shall be required to pass a cumulative final examination at the conclusion of the course that assesses student proficiency about the documents described in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section. Each state institution of higher education board of trustees shall adopt a resolution approving a plan to offer the course developed under this section. Each state institution shall submit that plan to the chancellor of higher education. The chancellor shall review and approve each plan. Prior to approving a plan, the chancellor may require a state institution to revise the plan and the course. Each state institution of higher education board of trustees also shall adopt a resolution specifying the conditions under which the state institution's president or designee may exempt a student under division (D)(3) of this section. (C) Beginning with students who graduate from a state institution of higher education in the spring semester, or equivalent quarter, of the 2029-2030 academic year, no state institution of higher education shall grant a bachelor's degree to any student unless the student completes a course described in division (B) of this section. A state institution may require students to complete the course as part of the institution's general education courses of study. (D) This division is subject to division (F) of this section. The president of a state institution of higher education, or the president's designee, may exempt a student from the requirement to complete a course described in division (B) of this section, if the president or designee determines that the student has completed at least one of the following: (1) A course offered under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code that satisfies the content requirements described in division (B) of this section and is approved by the chancellor; (2) An advanced placement course and examination that satisfy the content requirements described in division (B) of this section and are approved by the chancellor, and the student receives a score of three or higher on that examination; (3) At least three credit hours, or the equivalent, in a course in the subject area of American history or American government which includes the study of the documents described in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section. Division (D)(3) of this section does not apply after the 2030-2031 academic year. (E) This section does not apply to associate's degree programs. (F) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, all of the following apply: (1) The Ohio civics board has sole and exclusive authority over all aspects of American civic literacy courses established under this section, including course modality, syllabi, class size, faculty teachers, and course content. (2) American civic literacy courses offered by a state institution are subject to the approval of the board. The board may adopt standard, uniform, or model American civic literacy courses for use, exclusive or otherwise, in the board's judgment, in state institutions. (3) In each state institution that has an academic civics center, the civics center, or its designee, shall be the exclusive provider of any American civic literacy course in that institution. The academic civics center that provides an American civic literacy course shall receive the tuition, state share of instruction, and all other standard revenues associated with that course in the state institution. The academic civics center may designate providers of the American civic literacy course in its institution on such terms and conditions, as determined by the center's director. (4) In each state institution that does not have an academic civics center, the institution shall utilize an American civic literacy course approved by the Ohio civics board. Such a state institution may contract with an academic civics center for the center to offer the course at the institution. (5) The Ohio civics board has sole and exclusive authority over any American civic literacy class offered under the college credit plus program. The board shall determine whether and under what conditions such a course shall be offered. The board may license and authorize the offering of such a course on terms and conditions identified by the board. Sec. 3345.58. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Academic civics centers" means the following institutes or centers: (a) The center at the Ohio state university established under section 3335.39 of the Revised Code; (b) The center at Miami university established under section 3339.06 of the Revised Code; (c) The center at Cleveland state university established under section 3344.07 of the Revised Code; (d) The center at Wright state university established under section 3352.16 of the Revised Code; (e) The institute at the university of Toledo established under section 3364.07 of the Revised Code. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B)(B)(1) The Ohio civics board is established. The board shall consist of the directors of the academic civics centers, who shall serve as ex officio members. If an academic civics center does not have a director, then the center's acting or interim director shall serve on behalf of that center until a director is selected. No additional appointment or confirmation by any authority is required for membership. (2) The board may hire, fix the compensation of, and remove a director and such number of employees as the board determines necessary. (C) The board shall do all of the following: (1) Support the academic civics centers to more effectively pursue their mission of teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American and Ohio constitutional order and society; (2) Aid voluntary cooperation and coordination between the academic civics centers, including coordinating intercollegiate efforts and initiatives among the centers to promote collaboration and serve the entire state of Ohio; (3) Advise the general assembly and chancellor of higher education on matters pertaining to civic education, including best practices, program development, and statewide initiatives to enhance civic literacy and engagement; (4) Advise the general assembly and chancellor on curriculum development and standards in state institutions of higher education and primary and secondary public education providers, and on the operations of the academic civics centers; (5) Assist the academic councils of the academic civics centers in fulfilling their statutory duties, including facilitating the selection process for directors of each center; (6) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, exercise sole and exclusive authority over all aspects of American civic literacy courses established under section 3345.382 of the Revised Code, including course modality, syllabi, class size, faculty teachers, and course content; (7) Determine an annual amount to be contributed by each of the academic civics centers to support the board's operations. (D) Each of the academic civics centers shall annually pay to the board the amount determined under division (C)(7) of this section in a form and manner determined by the board. (E) The board shall annually elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members. The chairperson shall preside over meetings and serve as the primary liaison to the chancellor and the general assembly. The vice-chairperson shall perform the duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson. The board shall meet as necessary at the call of the chairperson or on the written request of three or more members of the board. The board shall meet at least twice annually. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum, and the votes of a majority of the quorum present are required to validate any action of the board, including recommendations. The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties on the board. (E)(F) The board shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and the chancellor not later than the first day of December each year. The report shall detail the board's activities, recommendations, and findings related to civic education, higher education curricula, primary and secondary public education curricula, and the operations of the academic civics centers. (F)(G) The board, in consultation with the chancellor, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. Sec. 3352.16. (A)(1) The Wright state university center for civics, culture, and workforce development is established as an independent academic division within Wright state university, physically located on the Dayton campus of Wright state university. The center shall have all the rights and privileges of an independent college of the university. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society and the United States armed forces. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic division, physically located on the Dayton campus of Wright state university, with the authority to house faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have a role in center faculty promotion and tenure, except with the consent of the director. No university policy shall govern the development and approval of curriculum within the center. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. Nothing in this section precludes the ability for the center to apply for external funding opportunities and negotiate overhead charges as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. (3) The university shall provide adequate annual financial resources to the center to achieve its mission, as determined by the director. The sum of the annual money transferred from the university to the center plus the annual appropriation from the state to the center shall not be less than the highest annual appropriation provided by the state to the center in a main operating appropriation act. (4) Notwithstanding any university budget allocation methodology to the contrary, the center shall receive all tuition and other revenue from all of the courses it offers, subject only to charges applied to all other academic units. (5) The center shall have the authority to create independent endowments, both temporary and permanent, and a foundation for the sole benefit of the center and place funds from whatever source, including gifts, donations, grants, university funds and state appropriations, in such endowments. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order, including the United States armed forces; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship; (d) The origins, purpose, and role of Wright-Patterson air force base and surrounding defense-related industries in supporting the United States; (e) The workforce needs of Wright-Patterson air force base and industries that support the base. (2) The center also shall focus on all of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community; (c) Increasing the awareness of Wright-Patterson air force base and supporting workforce needs to sustain and attract missions at the base. (D)(1) The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than three members of the council may be employees of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall consult with the provost; however, the director shall report directly to the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage all aspects of the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for and to hire all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff, subject to the approval of the board of trustees of the university. The director's authority includes determining the salary, tenure, and rank of faculty. The director may seek advice from faculty outside of the center but shall not be required to seek or receive such advice. The director shall have the sole, exclusive, and unlimited authority to oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval which of the center's courses that the director, in the director's sole and exclusive discretion, determines meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted have the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (4) Notwithstanding section 3333.164 of the Revised Code, the center shall develop a set of standards and procedures to maximize the granting of academic credit for military training, experience, and coursework. (5) Notwithstanding section 3333.31 of the Revised Code, Wright state university shall not charge more than its in-state instructional and general fees to any current or honorably discharged member of the United States armed forces, or the spouse or dependents of such a member, who enrolls in a program offered by the center, regardless of whether that member, spouse, or dependent is a resident of this state under rules adopted under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code. (F)(F)(1) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic division. (2) The president or provost of the university shall report to the board of trustees at every board meeting on the progress of the center toward achieving its mission and the university's support for the center, including its academic program development, faculty and staff hiring, facility, and development and advancement. Sec. 3364.07. (A)(1) The institute of American constitutional thought and leadership is established for the purpose of creating and disseminating knowledge about American constitutional thought and to form future leaders of the legal profession through research, scholarship, teaching, collaboration, and mentorship. The institute shall be an independent academic unit within the university of Toledo. The institute shall have all the rights and privileges of an independent college of the university. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the institute as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the institute. Nothing in this section precludes the ability for the institute to apply for external funding opportunities and negotiate overhead charges as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. (3) The university shall provide adequate annual financial resources to the institute to achieve its mission, as determined by the director. The sum of the annual money transferred from the university to the institute plus the annual appropriation from the state to the institute shall not be less than the highest annual appropriation provided by the state to the institute in a main operating appropriation act. (4) Notwithstanding any university budget allocation methodology to the contrary, the institute shall receive all tuition and other revenue from all of the courses it offers, subject only to charges applied to all other academic units. (5) The institute shall have the authority to create independent endowments, both temporary and permanent, and a foundation for the sole benefit of the institute and place funds from whatever source, including gifts, donations, grants, university funds and state appropriations, in such endowments. (B) The institute shall pursue all of the following goals: (1) To enrich the curriculum in American constitutional studies, including the core texts and great debates of western civilization; (2) To educate university students in the principles, ideals, and institutions of the American and Ohio constitutional order; (3) To educate university students in the foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship and to cultivate the next generation of leaders in the legal profession; (4) To offer university-wide programming related to the values of open inquiry and civil discourse; (5) To expand the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community and to create a rich forum for the development of ideas across the political and ideological spectrum; (6) To support faculty and graduate student scholarship that advances understanding of American constitutional thought and institutions; (7) To promote scholarly collaboration within the university and beyond; (8) To host lectures, debates, and symposia, and sponsor visiting scholars, jurists, and teachers. (C) The institute shall adhere to the following policies: (1) The institute shall educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth. (2) The institute shall equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of legal, social, and political importance. (3) The institute shall value intellectual diversity in higher education, including in faculty recruitment, hiring, and appointment, and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of academic life at the university. (4) The institute shall create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that naturally occur in a public university community. (D)(1) The talent, compensation, and governance committee of the board of trustees of the university, if such a committee exists, shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member institute academic council. If no such committee exists, the board of trustees shall appoint members under this division. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the council be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (4) To fill a vacancy for the institute director after the initial director, following a national search, the academic council shall transmit to the president a list of finalists from which the president shall select a director, subject to the approval of the talent, compensation, and governance committee of the board of trustees. (E)(1) The institute shall be led by a director who shall report directly to the president and provost of the university. The president of the university shall appoint the director. The director shall be an expert of the western tradition, the American founding, and American constitutional thought, and shall have shown a commitment to the purposes, goals, and policies of the institute. The director's term shall be for five years and shall be renewable. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. Any existing tenure with the university held by a director shall be maintained with the university. (F) The institute shall be an independent academic unit of the university with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the institute. Not fewer than five tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to the institute. Faculty appointed within the institute shall not be required, but may be permitted, to hold joint or courtesy appointments within any other division of the university. No faculty from outside the institute shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the institute. No faculty outside of the institute shall have a role in institute faculty promotion and tenure, except with the consent of the director. (G)(1) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage all aspects of the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment and to hire for all faculty and staff, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director's authority includes determining the salary, tenure, and rank of faculty. The director may seek advice from faculty outside of the center but shall not be required to seek or receive such advice. The director shall have the sole, exclusive, and unlimited authority to oversee, develop, and approve the institute's curriculum, including approval which of the institute's courses that the director, in the director's sole and exclusive discretion, determines meet the university's general education requirements. The institute shall be granted have the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, major, and graduate programs, and offer degrees. (2) Employment contracts offered under division (G)(1) of this section to tenure-track faculty appointed to the institute shall guarantee reappointment elsewhere in the university, at the same rank and compensation, in the event the institute is discontinued. (H)(H)(1) The director of the institute shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the institute's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. (2) The president or provost of the university shall report to the board of trustees at every board meeting on the progress of the center toward achieving its mission and the university's support for the center, including its academic program development, faculty and staff hiring, facility, and development and advancement. (I)(I)(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the institute of American constitutional thought and leadership shall be known as the school of American constitutional thought and leadership, and the director shall serve as dean of the school. On and after that date, whenever the term "institute" is used, referred to, or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the use, reference, or designation shall be construed to mean the "school" unless another section of law expressly provides otherwise. (2) The board of trustees of the university may change the name of the institute in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. Section 2. That existing sections 3335.39, 3339.06, 3344.07, 3345.382, 3345.58, 3352.16, and 3364.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Strengthening Ohio Civics Act.